Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.30.090

Commercial advertisers—Public inspection of documents—Copies to commission. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) Each commercial advertiser who has accepted or provided political advertising or electioneering communications during the election campaign shall maintain current books of account and related materials as provided by rule that shall be open for public inspection during normal business hours during the campaign and for a period of no less than five years after the date of the applicable election. The documents and books of account shall specify:

(a) The names and addresses of persons from whom it accepted political advertising or electioneering communications;

(b) The exact nature and extent of the services rendered; and

(c) The total cost and the manner of payment for the services.

(2) At the request of the commission, each commercial advertiser required to comply with subsection (1) of this section shall provide to the commission copies of the information that must be maintained and be open for public inspection pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2024 c 164 s 441; 2019 c 428 s 26; 2010 c 204 s 508; 2005 c 445 s 8; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 112 s 5; 1973 c 1 s 11 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.345, 42.17.110.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective dates—2005 c 445: See note following RCW 29B.30.010.

Construction—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 112: See note following RCW 29B.60.020.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.